Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-3228
Districts; powers;
Nebraska Association of Resources Districts; retirement plan reports; duties.

(1) Each district shall have the power and authority to:

(a) Receive and accept donations, gifts, grants, bequests,
appropriations, or other contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise
from the United States or any of its agencies, from the state or any of its
agencies or political subdivisions, or from any person as defined in section
49-801 and use or expend all such contributions in carrying on its operations;

(b) Establish advisory groups by appointing persons within
the district, pay necessary and proper expenses of such groups as the board
shall determine, and dissolve such groups;

(c) Employ such persons as are necessary to carry out its
authorized purposes and, in addition to other compensation provided, establish
and fund a pension plan designed and intended for the benefit of all permanent
full-time employees of the district. Any recognized method of funding a pension
plan may be employed. Employee contributions shall be required to fund at
least fifty percent of the benefits, and past service benefits may be included.
The district shall pay all costs of any such past service benefits, which
may be retroactive to July 1, 1972, and the plan may be integrated with old
age and survivors' insurance, generally known as social security. A uniform
pension plan, including the method for jointly funding such plan, shall be
established for all districts in the state. A district may elect not to participate
in such a plan but shall not establish an independent plan;

(d) Purchase liability, property damage, workers' compensation,
and other types of insurance as in the judgment of the board are necessary
to protect the assets of the district;

(e) Borrow money to carry out its authorized purposes;

(f) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
its authorized purposes; and

(g) Invite the local governing body of any municipality or
county to designate a representative to advise and counsel with the board
on programs and policies that may affect the property, water supply, or other
interests of such municipality or county.

(2)(a) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December 31 thereafter,
the Nebraska Association of Resources Districts as organized under the Interlocal
Cooperation Act shall file with the Public Employees Retirement Board an annual
report on each retirement plan established pursuant to this section and section
401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and shall submit copies of such report
to the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare
a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required
to do so. The annual report shall be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and shall contain the following information for each such
retirement plan:

(i) The number of persons participating in the retirement
plan;

(ii) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(iii) Plan assets and liabilities;

(iv) The names and positions of persons administering the
plan;

(v) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(vi) The form and nature of investments;

(vii) For each defined contribution plan, a full description
of investment policies and options available to plan participants; and

(viii) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits
of participants in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a
benefit, and the total present value of such members' benefits, as well as
the funding sources which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the association
may file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees Retirement
Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits, and the sources
and amount of funding for such benefits.

(b) If such retirement plan is
a defined benefit plan which
was open to new members on January 1, 2004, in addition to the reports required by section 13-2402, the
association shall cause to be prepared an
annual report and shall file the same with the Public Employees
Retirement Board and the Nebraska
Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature and submit to
the Auditor of Public Accounts a copy of such report. The Auditor of Public
Accounts may prepare a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02
but is not required to do so. If
the association does not submit a copy of the report to the Auditor of Public
Accounts within six months after the end of the plan year, the Auditor of
Public Accounts may audit, or cause to be audited, the association. All costs
of the audit shall be paid by the association. The report shall
consist of a full actuarial analysis of each such retirement plan established
pursuant to this section. The analysis shall be prepared by an independent
private organization or public entity employing actuaries who are members
in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, and which organization
or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this type of analysis and
is unrelated to any organization offering investment advice or which provides
investment management services to the retirement plan. The report to the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 28, p. 118;

Laws 1975, LB 404, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 36, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 387, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 15, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 891, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB759, § 2.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.